Mississippi, session 2026, HB1549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as "Alyssa's Law." SECTION 2.  The Legislature finds that ensuring the safety of students and staff in public schools and charter schools is of paramount importance.  To enhance emergency response capabilities, school districts shall implement silent panic alarm systems capable of directly alerting law enforcement in the event of an emergency.  This act further establishes a grant program to assist school districts in meeting the requirements set forth herein. SECTION 3.  As used in this act, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein, unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Silent Panic Alarm System" means a system that utilizes technology to silently and directly notify local law enforcement agencies of an emergency situation within a school building. (b)  "School District" means any public school district within the State of Mississippi. (c)  "Eligible School" means any public elementary, middle or high school under the jurisdiction of a school district or charter school under the jurisdiction of a charter school governing board. SECTION 4.  (1)  Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each local school district and charter school shall ensure that all eligible schools under their jurisdiction implement and install a silent panic alarm system meeting the following requirements: (a)  The system must integrate capabilities of directly notifying local law enforcement agencies of an emergency with infrastructure to transmit E-911 call and mobile activation; (b)  The system must allow for activation by authorized personnel in a discreet manner; and (c)  The system must integrate with other existing school safety protocols consistent with the provisions of Sections 37-3-81, 37-3-83, 37-7-321, 37-7-323, 37-11-5, 37-11-29, 37-11-54, 37-11-67, 37-11-83, 37-13-91 and 37-47-1 et seq. (2)  Each school district and charter school shall provide each member of its personnel with a wearable panic alert device throughout each school facility, which allows for immediate contact with local law enforcement and emergency response agencies, and the capability of initiating a campus-wide lockdown notification. (3)  (a)  Each school district and charter school shall establish and maintain a memorandum of understanding (MOU) with local law enforcement agencies to coordinate response procedures and ensure compatibility of the panic alarm system with local emergency communication systems. (b)  School districts and charter schools must provide regular training to school personnel and law enforcement on the protocol and appropriate use of the panic alarm system before the start of each school year. (4)  (a)  Each school district and charter school shall: (i)  Ensure that all security data, i.e., cameras, maps, access control, within a school building are accessible by local law enforcement and emergency response agencies; and (ii)  Coordinate with local law enforcement and emergency response agencies to establish appropriate access protocols. (b)  Any records, information, photographs, audio and visual presentations, schematic diagrams, surveys, recommendation or consultation or portions thereof relating directly to the physical security or fire safety of the school facility or revealing security or fire safety systems held by an agency shall remain confidential and exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983 under the provisions of Chapter 61, Title 25, Mississippi Code of 1972.  However, any information made confidential and exempted under the authority of this paragraph (b) may be disclosed: (i)  To the property owner or leaseholder; (ii)  In furtherance of the official duties and responsibilities of the agency holding the information; (iii)  To another local, state or federal agency in furtherance of that agency's official duties and responsibilities; or (iv)  Upon a showing of good cause before a court of competent jurisdiction. (5)  Each school district and charter school shall submit an annual report to the State Department of Education detailing compliance with this act and any incidents requiring the use of the panic alarm system. SECTION 5.  (1)  The State Department of Education shall establish and administer a grant program to assist school districts and charter schools in complying with the provisions of this act. (2)  School districts and charter schools shall be eligible to receive grant funds if the local school board or charter school governing board: (a)  Submits a completed application in a format prescribed by the State Department of Education; (b)  Demonstrates financial need; (c)  Provides documentation of coordination with local law enforcement agencies; and (d)  Presents a detailed implementation plan for installing and maintaining a silent panic alarm system. (3)  Grant funds shall be used exclusively for: (a)  The purchase, installation and maintenance of silent panic alarm systems; (b)  Training of school personnel and law enforcement and emergency response agency personnel on the use of such systems; and (c)  Any other purposes directly related to compliance with this act as determined by the State Department of Education. (4)  The Legislature shall appropriate funds annually for the administration of this grant program by the department, which shall allocate funds to school districts based on demonstrated need and compliance with this act. (5)  (a)  School districts receiving grant funds shall submit an annual report to the department detailing the use of funds and progress in implementing silent panic alarm systems. (b)  The department shall conduct periodic audits to ensure proper use of grant funds. SECTION 6.  The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this act, to protect the health and safety of students, educators and school personnel, including, but not limited to: (a)  Establishing technical standards for silent panic alarm systems; (b)  Developing application procedures for the grant program; and (c)  Setting minimum training requirements for school personnel and local law enforcement. SECTION 7.  If any provision of this act or the application thereof is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect the other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this act are declared severable. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.